Utah statutes.
53C-2-302.   Enforcement of this chapter -- County attorney to prosecute.

(1)  It is the duty of the administration and all law enforcement officers to enforce this chapter within their respective jurisdictions and to investigate and gather evidence that may indicate a violation under this chapter.

(2)  The county attorney shall prosecute any criminal violation of this chapter.

